Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,304
Load; contents; requirements; vehicle that contained livestock; spill prohibited; violation; penalty.

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section for a vehicle that contained livestock, but still contains the manure or urine of such livestock, no vehicle shall be driven or moved on any highway unless the vehicle is so constructed or loaded as to prevent its contents from dropping, sifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping from the vehicle.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section for a vehicle that contained livestock, but still contains the manure or urine of such livestock, no person shall transport any sand, gravel, rock less than two inches in diameter, or refuse in any vehicle on any hard-surfaced state highway if such material protrudes above the sides of that part of the vehicle in which it is being transported unless such material is enclosed or completely covered with canvas or similar covering.

(c) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section for commercial motor vehicles and commercial trailers, no person shall drive or move a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer upon any highway unless the cargo or contents carried by the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer are properly distributed and adequately secured to prevent the falling of cargo or contents from the vehicle. The tailgate, doors, tarpaulins, and any other equipment used in the operation of the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer or in the distributing or securing of the cargo or contents carried by the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer shall be secured to prevent cargo or contents falling from the vehicle. The means of securement to the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer must be either tiedowns and tiedown assemblies of adequate strength or sides, sideboards, or stakes and a rear endgate, endboard, or stakes strong enough and high enough to assure that cargo or contents will not fall from the vehicle.

(d) Any person who violates any provision of this subsection is guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

(2)(a) No person operating any vehicle that contained livestock, but still contains the manure or urine of livestock, on any highway located within the corporate limits of a city of the metropolitan class, shall spill manure or urine from the vehicle.

(b) Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor and shall be assessed a minimum fine of at least two hundred fifty dollars.

(3)(a) No person shall drive or move a commercial motor vehicle or commercial trailer upon any highway unless the cargo or contents carried by the commercial motor vehicle or commercial trailer are properly distributed and adequately secured to prevent the falling of cargo or contents from the vehicle. The tailgate, doors, tarpaulins, and any other equipment used in the operation of the commercial motor vehicle or commercial trailer or in the distributing or securing of the cargo or contents carried by the commercial motor vehicle or commercial trailer shall be secured to prevent cargo or contents falling from the vehicle. The structures, systems, parts, and components used to secure the cargo or contents shall be in proper working order with no damaged or weakened components that affect performance so as to cause the cargo or contents to fall from the commercial motor vehicle or commercial trailer. The means of securement to the commercial motor vehicle or commercial trailer shall be either tiedowns and tiedown assemblies of adequate strength or sides, sideboards, or stakes and a rear endgate, endboard, or stakes strong enough and high enough to ensure that cargo or contents will not fall from the commercial motor vehicle or commercial trailer.

(b)(i) Violation of this subsection is an infraction, and the person driving or moving a commercial motor vehicle or commercial trailer in violation of this subsection shall be fined two hundred dollars for the first offense and five hundred dollars for a second or subsequent offense.

(ii) In addition to the issuance of a citation to an operator under subdivision (b)(i) of this subsection, the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety may assess the owner of the vehicle a civil penalty for each violation of this subsection of one thousand dollars. The superintendent shall issue an order imposing a penalty under this subdivision in the same manner as an order issued under section 75-369.04 and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under section 75-368 and any applicable federal rules and regulations.

(c) For purposes of this subsection:

(i) Commercial motor vehicle has the same meaning as in section 60-316; and

(ii) Commercial trailer has the same meaning as in section 60-317.

Laws 1969, c. 304, § 1, p. 1095;

R.S.Supp.,1972, § 39-735.02;

Laws 1974, LB 593, § 7;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 21;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,129;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 400;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 28;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 463;

Laws 2007, LB147, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB174, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB698, § 1.